Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1320.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 301. Definitions.--Any reference in this article to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as amended to January 1, 1997, unless the reference contains the phrase "as amended" and refers to no other date, in which case the reference shall be to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 it exists as of the time of application of this article. The following words, terms and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(l.3) "Nonpublic school" means as defined in section 923.3-A(b) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the "Public School Code of 1949."* * *(o.6) "Qualified student" means an individual who:(1) is of school age;(2) is a resident of this Commonwealth; and(3) attends a school entity or nonpublic school in this Commonwealth or is home-schooled.(o.7) "Qualified youth sport participation expense" means a cost incurred by a parent, guardian or grandparent of a qualified student that is necessary for the qualified student's participation in a qualified youth sports program. The term includes the cost of required sports equipment, travel costs and participation fees.(o.8) "Qualified youth sports program" means a program that provides a recreational, non-professional competitive or scholastic sports program that is primarily for qualified students.* * *(s.3) "School age" means the earliest admission age for beginners, as the term is defined under section 1304(c) of the "Public School Code of 1949," until the end of the school year in which a student attains twenty-one years of age or graduation from high school, whichever occurs first.20260SB1320PN1706 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (s.4) "School entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.(s.5) "Sports program" means a competitive sport formally recognized as a sport by the United States Olympic Committee as specified by and under the jurisdiction of the Amateur Sports Act of 1978 (Public Law 95-606, 36 U.S.C. § 371 et seq.), the Amateur Athletic Union, the National Collegiate Athletic Association or the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 314.1. Youth Sport Participation Cost Tax Credit.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (b), a resident individual taxpayer may claim a credit against tax under this article:(1) equal to the amount of qualified youth sport participation expenses incurred by the resident individual taxpayer during a taxable year; and(2) if the resident individual taxpayer has a gross monthly household income at or below three hundred per cent of the Federal poverty level.(b) (1) For a resident individual taxpayer whose tax liability under this article is determined on a separate basis, the amount of tax credit under this section may not be more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).(2) For a resident individual taxpayer who filed a joint return with another resident individual taxpayer, the aggregate amount of tax credit under this section for the resident individual taxpayers who file the joint return may not be more 20260SB1320PN1706 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than three thousand dollars ($3,000).(c) A tax credit under this section may not be refunded to a taxpayer and may not be carried forward or backward to other taxable years.(d) The department shall establish forms as may be necessary for the administration of this section.Section 3. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1320PN1706 - 4 - 123456789